Utah statutes.
7-9-50.   General limitation on liability.

A director, supervisory committee member, credit committee member, or officer is not liable to the credit union, its members, its depositors, any conservator or receiver, or any assignee or successor-in-interest thereof, for any action taken, or any failure to take any action, as a director, supervisory committee member, credit committee member, or officer, as the case may be, unless:

(1)  he has breached or failed to perform the duties of the office in compliance with this title; and

(2)  the breach or failure to perform constitutes gross negligence, willful misconduct, or intentional infliction of harm on the credit union or its members.



Enacted by Chapter 200, 1994 General Session

